Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska58-522
Obligee; rights.

An obligee of a contracting public body shall have the right in addition to all other rights which may be conferred upon such obligee, subject only to any contractual restrictions binding upon such obligee:

(1) By mandamus, suit, action, or proceeding at law or in equity to compel the contracting public body and the members, officers, agents, or employees to perform each and every term, provision, and covenant contained in any contract of the contracting public body with or for the benefit of such obligee and to require the carrying out of any or all such covenants and agreements to the contracting public body and the fulfillment of all duties imposed upon the contracting public body by the provisions of the Nebraska Redevelopment Act; and

(2) By suit, action, or proceeding in equity to enjoin any acts or things which may be unlawful or the violation of any of the rights of such obligee of the contracting public body.

Laws 1995, LB 830, § 22.